Maryland, session 2025, HB0874.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 8–212 through 8–218 of Article – Tax – Property of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
8–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0874*

HOUSE BILL 874
(b) Real property is a class of property and is divided into the following subclasses:
(1) land that is actively devoted to farm or agricultural use, assessed under
§ 8–209 of this title;
(2) marshland, assessed under § 8–210 of this title;
(3) woodland, assessed under § 8–211 of this title;
(4) [land of a country club or golf course, assessed under §§ 8–212 through
8–217 of this title;
(5)] land that is used for a planned development, assessed under §§ 8–220
through 8–225 of this title;
[(6)] (5) rezoned real property that is used for residential purposes,
assessed under §§ 8–226 through 8–228 of this title;
[(7)] (6) operating real property of a railroad;
[(8)] (7) operating real property of a public utility;
[(9)] (8) property valued under § 8–105(a)(3) of this subtitle;
[(10)] (9) conservation property, assessed under § 8–209.1 of this title; and
[(11)] (10) all other real property that is directed by this article to be
assessed.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.